Utah statutes.
17B-1-632.   District clerk -- Bookkeeping duties.

The district clerk or other designated person not performing treasurer duties shall maintain the financial records for each fund of the local district and all related subsidiary records, including a list of the outstanding bonds, their purpose, amount, terms, date, and place payable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

